Utah statutes.
31A-11-110.   Registration of agents.

No person may execute, issue, or deliver any motor club service contract to any person or receive anything of value for the contract either before or after its execution, unless he is registered with the commissioner.  A person is registered upon filing a statement including his name, home and business address, telephone number, and motor club represented with the commissioner, on a form prescribed by the commissioner, and upon payment of all the fees due under Section 31A-3-103.  Registered persons shall give the commissioner notice of any change in registration information.

